Illinois, session 104th, SB3872.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 5Section 15-171 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-171 new)7    Sec. 15-171. Free and clear senior homestead exemption.8    (a) Beginning in taxable year 2027, qualified senior 9homestead property is exempt from taxation under the 10provisions of this Code. 11    (b) For land improved with an apartment building owned and 12operated as a cooperative, the maximum reduction from the 13value of the property, as equalized by the Department, shall 14be multiplied by the number of apartments or units occupied by 15a qualified senior citizen. For land improved with a life care 16facility, the maximum reduction from the value of the 17property, as equalized by the Department, shall be multiplied 18by the number of apartments or units occupied by a qualified 19senior citizen. In a cooperative or a life care facility where 20a homestead exemption has been granted, the cooperative 21association or the management firm of the cooperative or 22facility shall credit the savings resulting from that 23exemption only to the apportioned tax liability of the owner   SB3872- 2 -LRB104 20188 HLH 33639 b1or resident who qualified for the exemption. Any person who 2willfully refuses to so credit the savings shall be guilty of a 3Class B misdemeanor. Under this Section and Sections 15-175, 415-176, and 15-177, "life care facility" means a facility, as 5defined in Section 2 of the Life Care Facilities Act, with 6which the applicant for the homestead exemption has a life 7care contract as defined in that Act 8    (c) If a homestead exemption has been granted under this 9Section and the person qualifying subsequently becomes a 10resident of a facility licensed under the Assisted Living and 11Shared Housing Act, the Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized 12Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD Community 13Care Act, or the MC/DD Act, the exemption shall continue so 14long as the residence continues to be occupied by the 15qualifying person's spouse if the spouse is 75 years of age or 16older, or if the residence remains unoccupied but is still 17owned by the person qualified for the homestead exemption. 18    (d) The assessor or chief county assessment officer may 19determine the eligibility of a life care facility to receive 20the benefits provided by this Section, by affidavit, 21application, visual inspection, questionnaire or other 22reasonable methods in order to ensure that the tax savings 23resulting from the exemption are credited by the management 24firm to the apportioned tax liability of each qualifying 25resident. The assessor may request reasonable proof that the 26management firm has so credited the exemption.   SB3872- 3 -LRB104 20188 HLH 33639 b1    (e) As used in this Section: 2    "Consumer Price Index" means the index published by the 3Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of 4Labor that measures the average change in prices of goods and 5services purchased by all urban consumers, United States city 6average, all items, 1982-84 = 100. 7    "Household income" has the meaning given to that term in 8Section 15-172. 9    "Maximum income limitation" means (i) for taxable year 102027, $100,000 and (ii) for taxable years after 2027, the 11maximum income limitation for the immediately preceding 12taxable year, multiplied by one plus the percentage increase, 13if any, in the Consumer Price Index for the calendar year 14immediately preceding the taxable year. 15    "Qualified senior citizen" means a person who:16        (1) is 75 years of age or older on January 1 of the 17    taxable year for which the exemption will be applied; and 18        (2) has a household income that does not exceed the 19    maximum income limitation. 20    "Qualified senior homestead property" means homestead 21property that:22        (1) is used as a primary residence by qualified senior 23    citizen who has an ownership interest in the property, 24    legal, equitable, or as a lessee, and who is liable for the 25    payment of property taxes; 26        (2) is not used as a primary residence by a student at   SB3872- 4 -LRB104 20188 HLH 33639 b1    a school district or a community college district in the 2    State; and 3        (3) is not subject to any liens, including, but not 4    limited to, a mortgage, home equity line of credit, or 5    reverse mortgage.